Georgia, session 2025_26, SB15.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elections and
primaries generally, is amended in Code Section 21-2-139, relating to nonpartisan elections
authorized and conduct, by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, the General
Assembly may provide by local Act for the election in nonpartisan elections of candidates
to fill county judicial offices, offices of local boards of education, offices of county
governing authorities, and offices of consolidated governments which are filled by the vote
of the electors of said county or political subdivision. Except as otherwise provided in this
Code section, the procedures to be employed in such nonpartisan elections shall conform
as nearly as practicable to the procedures governing nonpartisan elections as provided in
S. B. 15
- 1 -

LC 47 3115
this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the election procedures
established by any existing local law which provides for the nonpartisan election of
candidates to fill county offices shall conform to the general procedures governing
nonpartisan elections as provided in this chapter, and such nonpartisan elections shall be
conducted in accordance with the applicable provisions of this chapter, notwithstanding the
provisions of any existing local law. For those offices for which the General Assembly,
pursuant to this Code section, provided by local Act for election in nonpartisan primaries and
elections, such offices shall no longer require nonpartisan primaries. Such officers shall be
elected in nonpartisan elections held and conducted in conjunction with the general primary
in even-numbered years in accordance with this chapter without a prior nonpartisan primary.
This Code section shall apply to all nonpartisan elections for members of consolidated
governments. All nonpartisan elections for members of consolidated governments shall be
governed by the provisions of this Code section and shall be considered county elections and
not municipal elections for the purposes of this Code section. Nonpartisan elections for
municipal offices shall be conducted on the dates provided in the municipal charter."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 15
- 2 -